Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1591.01
Operational life of the facility, defined.

Operational life of the facility shall mean the period of time commencing when low-level radioactive waste is initially received at the facility and ending when the facility permanently ceases to receive such waste for disposal.

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 6.